Nebraska, session 109, LB83.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Section 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the
Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact. The State of Nebraska adopts the
Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact in the form substantially as
follows:
SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE
The purposes of this Compact are to facilitate the interstate
practice of dentistry and dental hygiene and improve public access to
dentistry and dental hygiene services by providing Dentists and Dental
Hygienists licensed in a Participating State the ability to practice in
Participating States in which they are not licensed. The Compact does
this by establishing a pathway for Dentists and Dental Hygienists
licensed in a Participating State to obtain a Compact Privilege that
authorizes them to practice in another Participating State in which they
are not licensed. The Compact enables Participating States to protect the
public health and safety with respect to the practice of such Dentists
and Dental Hygienists, through the State's authority to regulate the
practice of dentistry and dental hygiene in the State. The Compact:
A. Enables Dentists and Dental Hygienists who qualify for a Compact
Privilege to practice in other Participating States without satisfying
burdensome and duplicative requirements associated with securing a
License to practice in those States;
B. Promotes mobility and addresses workforce shortages through each
Participating State's acceptance of a Compact Privilege to practice in
that State;
C. Increases public access to qualified, licensed Dentists and
Dental Hygienists by creating a responsible, streamlined pathway for
Licensees to practice in Participating States;
D. Enhances the ability of Participating States to protect the
public's health and safety;
E. Does not interfere with licensure requirements established by a
Participating State;
-2-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
F. Facilitates the sharing of licensure and disciplinary information
among Participating States;
G. Requires Dentists and Dental Hygienists who practice in a
Participating State pursuant to a Compact Privilege to practice within
the Scope of Practice authorized in that State;
H. Extends the authority of a Participating State to regulate the
practice of dentistry and dental hygiene within its borders to Dentists
and Dental Hygienists who practice in the State through a Compact
Privilege;
I. Promotes the cooperation of Participating States in regulating
the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene within those States; and
J. Facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses
who are licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
A. "Active Military Member" means any person with full-time duty
status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the
National Guard and Reserve.
B. "Adverse Action" means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed
on a License or Compact Privilege by a State Licensing Authority.
C. "Alternative Program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or
practice remediation process applicable to a Dentist or Dental Hygienist
approved by a State Licensing Authority of a Participating State in which
the Dentist or Dental Hygienist is licensed. This includes, but is not
limited to, programs to which Licensees with substance abuse or addiction
issues are referred in lieu of Adverse Action.
D. "Clinical Assessment" means examination or process, required for
licensure as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist as applicable, that provides
evidence of clinical competence in dentistry or dental hygiene.
E. "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a Participating
-3-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
State to serve as the member of the Commission for that Participating
State.
F. "Compact" means this Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact.
G. "Compact Privilege" means the authorization granted by a Remote
State to allow a Licensee from a Participating State to practice as a
Dentist or Dental Hygienist in a Remote State.
H. "Continuing Professional Development" means a requirement, as a
condition of License renewal, to provide evidence of successful
participation in educational or professional activities relevant to
practice or area of work.
I. "Criminal Background Check" means the submission of fingerprints
or other biometric-based information for a License applicant for the
purpose of obtaining that applicant's criminal history record
information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(d) from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the State's criminal history record repository as
defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(f).
J. "Data System" means the Commission's repository of information
about Licensees, including, but not limited to, examination, licensure,
investigative, Compact Privilege, Adverse Action, and Alternative
Program.
K. "Dental Hygienist" means an individual who is licensed by a State
Licensing Authority to practice dental hygiene.
L. "Dentist" means an individual who is licensed by a State
Licensing Authority to practice dentistry.
M. "Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission" or "Commission"
means a joint government agency established by this Compact comprised of
each State that has enacted the Compact and a national administrative
body comprised of a Commissioner from each State that has enacted the
Compact.
N. "Encumbered License" means a License that a State Licensing
Authority has limited in any way other than through an Alternative
-4-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Program.
O. "Executive Board" means the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and
Treasurer and any other Commissioners as may be determined by Commission
Rule or bylaw.
P. "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an
individual's knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the practice of
dentistry or dental hygiene, as applicable, in a State.
Q. "License" means current authorization by a State, other than
authorization pursuant to a Compact Privilege, or other privilege, for an
individual to practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in that State.
R. "Licensee" means an individual who holds an unrestricted License
from a Participating State to practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist
in that State.
S. "Model Compact" means the model for the Dentist and Dental
Hygienist Compact on file with the Council of State Governments or other
entity as designated by the Commission.
T. "Participating State" means a State that has enacted the Compact
and been admitted to the Commission in accordance with the provisions
herein and Commission Rules.
U. "Qualifying License" means a License that is not an Encumbered
License issued by a Participating State to practice dentistry or dental
hygiene.
V. "Remote State" means a Participating State where a Licensee who
is not licensed as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist is exercising or seeking
to exercise the Compact Privilege.
W. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the
force of law.
X. "Scope of Practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes
a Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensed in a State is permitted to
undertake in that State and the circumstances under which the Licensee is
permitted to undertake those procedures, actions, and processes. Such
-5-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
procedures, actions, and processes and the circumstances under which they
may be undertaken may be established through means, including, but not
limited to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available
to the State Licensing Authority or other government agency.
Y. "Significant Investigative Information" means information,
records, and documents received or generated by a State Licensing
Authority pursuant to an investigation for which a determination has been
made that there is probable cause to believe that the Licensee has
violated a statute or regulation that is considered more than a minor
infraction for which the State Licensing Authority could pursue Adverse
Action against the Licensee.
Z. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States of America that regulates the practices of dentistry
and dental hygiene.
AA. "State Licensing Authority" means an agency or other entity of a
State that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of Dentists or
Dental Hygienists.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. In order to join the Compact and thereafter continue as a
Participating State, a State must:
1. Enact a compact that is not materially different from the Model
Compact as determined in accordance with Commission Rules;
2. Participate fully in the Commission's Data System;
3. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about its Licensees and License applicants;
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the
Compact and Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability
of Significant Investigative Information regarding a Licensee and License
applicant;
5. Fully implement a Criminal Background Check requirement, within a
timeframe established by Commission Rule, by receiving the results of a
-6-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
qualifying Criminal Background Check;
6. Comply with the Commission Rules applicable to a Participating
State;
7. Accept the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on
National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by
Commission Rule as a licensure examination;
8. Accept for licensure applicants for a Dentist License that
graduate from a predoctoral dental education program accredited by the
Commission on Dental Accreditation, or another accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education for the
accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs, leading
to the Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine
(D.M.D.) degree;
9. Accept for licensure applicants for a Dental Hygienist License
that graduate from a dental hygiene education program accredited by the
Commission on Dental Accreditation or another accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education for the
accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs;
10. Require for licensure that applicants successfully complete a
Clinical Assessment;
11. Have Continuing Professional Development requirements as a
condition for License renewal; and
12. Pay a participation fee to the Commission as established by
Commission Rule.
B. Providing alternative pathways for an individual to obtain an
unrestricted License does not disqualify a State from participating in
the Compact.
C. When conducting a Criminal Background Check, the State Licensing
Authority shall:
1. Consider that information in making a licensure decision;
2. Maintain documentation of completion of the Criminal Background
-7-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Check and background check information to the extent allowed by State and
federal law; and
3. Report to the Commission whether it has completed the Criminal
Background Check and whether the individual was granted or denied a
License.
D. A Licensee of a Participating State who has a Qualifying License
in that State and does not hold an Encumbered License in any other
Participating State shall be issued a Compact Privilege in a Remote State
in accordance with the terms of the Compact and Commission Rules. If a
Remote State has a Jurisprudence Requirement, a Compact Privilege will
not be issued to the Licensee unless the Licensee has satisfied the
Jurisprudence Requirement.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To obtain and exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
1. Have a Qualifying License as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in a
Participating State;
2. Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Remote State in
accordance with subsections D, G, and H of this section;
3. Submit to an application process whenever the Licensee is seeking
a Compact Privilege;
4. Pay any applicable Commission and Remote State fees for a Compact
Privilege in the Remote State;
5. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirement established by a Remote State
in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege;
6. Have passed a National Board Examination of the Joint Commission
on National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by
Commission Rule;
7. For a Dentist, have graduated from a predoctoral dental education
program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or another
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
-8-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education
programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of
Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
8. For a Dental Hygienist, have graduated from a dental hygiene
education program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or
another accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education
programs;
9. Have successfully completed a Clinical Assessment for licensure;
10. Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by any non-
Participating State when applying for a Compact Privilege and, otherwise,
within thirty days from the date the Adverse Action is taken;
11. Report to the Commission when applying for a Compact Privilege
the address of the Licensee's primary residence and thereafter
immediately report to the Commission any change in the address of the
Licensee's primary residence; and
12. Consent to accept service of process by mail at the Licensee's
primary residence on record with the Commission with respect to any
action brought against the Licensee by the Commission or a Participating
State, and consent to accept service of a subpoena by mail at the
Licensee's primary residence on record with the Commission with respect
to any action brought or investigation conducted by the Commission or a
Participating State.
B. The Licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection A of
this section to maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote State. If
those requirements are met, the Compact Privilege will continue as long
as the Licensee maintains a Qualifying License in the State through which
the Licensee applied for the Compact Privilege and pays any applicable
Compact Privilege renewal fees.
C. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene in a Remote
State under the Compact Privilege shall function within the Scope of
-9-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Practice authorized by the Remote State for a Dentist or Dental Hygienist
licensed in that State.
D. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene pursuant to a
Compact Privilege in a Remote State is subject to that State's regulatory
authority. A Remote State may, in accordance with due process and that
State's laws, by Adverse Action revoke or remove a Licensee's Compact
Privilege in the Remote State for a specific period of time and impose
fines or take any other necessary actions to protect the health and
safety of its citizens. If a Remote State imposes an Adverse Action
against a Compact Privilege that limits the Compact Privilege, that
Adverse Action applies to all Compact Privileges in all Remote States. A
Licensee whose Compact Privilege in a Remote State is removed for a
specified period of time is not eligible for a Compact Privilege in any
other Remote State until the specific time for removal of the Compact
Privilege has passed and all encumbrance requirements are satisfied.
E. If a License in a Participating State is an Encumbered License,
the Licensee shall lose the Compact Privilege in a Remote State and shall
not be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the
License is no longer encumbered.
F. Once an Encumbered License in a Participating State is restored
to good standing, the Licensee must meet the requirements of subsection A
of this section to obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
G. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is removed by
the Remote State, the individual shall lose or be ineligible for the
Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the Compact Privilege was
removed has ended; and
2. All conditions for removal of the Compact Privilege have been
satisfied.
H. Once the requirements of subsection G of this section have been
met, the Licensee must meet the requirements in subsection A of this
-10-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
section to obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS AND THEIR SPOUSES
An Active Military Member and the member's spouse shall not be
required to pay to the Commission for a Compact Privilege the fee
otherwise charged by the Commission. If a Remote State chooses to charge
a fee for a Compact Privilege, it may choose to charge a reduced fee or
no fee to an Active Military Member and the member's spouse for a Compact
Privilege.
SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A Participating State in which a Licensee is licensed shall have
exclusive authority to impose Adverse Action against the Qualifying
License issued by that Participating State.
B. A Participating State may take Adverse Action based on the
Significant Investigative Information of a Remote State, so long as the
Participating State follows its own procedures for imposing Adverse
Action.
C. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Participating State's
decision that participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu
of Adverse Action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if
required by the Participating State's laws. Participating States must
require Licensees who enter any Alternative Program in lieu of discipline
to agree not to practice pursuant to a Compact Privilege in any other
Participating State during the term of the Alternative Program without
prior authorization from such other Participating State.
D. Any Participating State in which a Licensee is applying to
practice or is practicing pursuant to a Compact Privilege may investigate
actual or alleged violations of the statutes and regulations authorizing
the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene in any other Participating
State in which the Dentist or Dental Hygienist holds a License or Compact
Privilege.
E. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
-11-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
1. Take Adverse Actions as set forth in Section 4.D against a
Licensee's Compact Privilege in the State;
2. In furtherance of its rights and responsibilities under the
Compact and the Commission's Rules, issue subpoenas for hearings and
investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and
for the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a State Licensing
Authority in a Participating State for the attendance and testimony of
witnesses, or the production of evidence from another Participating
State, shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of competent
jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court
applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The
issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage,
and other fees required by the service statutes of the State where the
witnesses or evidence are located; and
3. If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from the Licensee
the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any
Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Participating State by
its Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensure act or other applicable State
law, a Participating State may jointly investigate Licensees with other
Participating States.
2. Participating States shall share any Significant Investigative
Information, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any
joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact.
G. Authority to Continue Investigation
1. After a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is
terminated, the Remote State may continue an investigation of the
Licensee that began when the Licensee had a Compact Privilege in that
Remote State.
2. If the investigation yields what would be Significant
-12-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Investigative Information had the Licensee continued to have a Compact
Privilege in that Remote State, the Remote State shall report the
presence of such information to the Data System as required by Section
8.B.6 as if it was Significant Investigative Information.
SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION.
A. The Compact Participating States hereby create and establish a
joint government agency whose membership consists of all Participating
States that have enacted the Compact. The Commission is an
instrumentality of the Participating States acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come into
existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in
Section 11.A.
B. Participation, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Participating State shall have and be limited to one
Commissioner selected by that Participating State's State Licensing
Authority or, if the State has more than one State Licensing Authority,
selected collectively by the State Licensing Authorities.
2. The Commissioner shall be a member or designee of such Authority
or Authorities.
3. The Commission may by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office
for Commissioners and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The Commission may recommend to a State Licensing Authority or
Authorities, as applicable, removal or suspension of an individual as the
State's Commissioner.
5. A Participating State's State Licensing Authority, or
Authorities, as applicable, shall fill any vacancy of its Commissioner on
the Commission within sixty days of the vacancy.
6. Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters
that are voted upon by the Commission.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The
-13-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Commission may meet by telecommunication, videoconference, or other
similar electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Adopt Rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions
of this Compact, the Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of
the Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing
Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a
Participating State as the authenticated business records of the
Commission, and designate a person to do so on the Commission's behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including,
but not limited to, employees of a Participating State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out
the purposes of the Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel
policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications
of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
12. As set forth in the Commission Rules, charge a fee to a Licensee
for the grant of a Compact Privilege in a Remote State and thereafter, as
may be established by Commission Rule, charge the Licensee a Compact
Privilege renewal fee for each renewal period in which that Licensee
exercises or intends to exercise the Compact Privilege in that Remote
State. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a Remote State from
charging a Licensee a fee for a Compact Privilege or renewals of a
-14-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Compact Privilege, or a fee for the Jurisprudence Requirement if the
Remote State imposes such a requirement for the grant of a Compact
Privilege;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of
money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at
all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or
conflict of interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, which may be
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested
persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
20. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and Treasurer and such
other officers of the Commission as provided in the Commission's bylaws;
21. Establish and elect an Executive Board;
22. Adopt and provide to the Participating States an annual report;
23. Determine whether a State's enacted compact is materially
different from the Model Compact language such that the State would not
qualify for participation in the Compact; and
24. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate
to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to
-15-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
this subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings
shall be posted on the Commission's website at least thirty days prior to
the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection D.1 of this section, the Commission
may convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least twenty-four
hours prior notice on the Commission's website, and any other means as
provided in the Commission's Rules, for any of the reasons it may
dispense with notice of proposed rulemaking under Section 9.L. The
Commission's legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons
justifying an emergency public meeting has been met.
3. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date,
and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or
accessible via telecommunication, videoconference, or other electronic
means, the notice shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting
through such means.
4. The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the
Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a Participating State with its obligations under
the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters,
practices, or procedures related to specific employees or other matters
related to the Commission's internal personnel practices and procedures;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee or Compact
Privilege holder by the Commission or by a Participating State's
Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of
goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
-16-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or
on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues
pursuant to the Compact;
k. Legal advice;
l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by
federal or Participating State law; and
m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding
officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each
relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the
minutes.
6. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a
description of the views expressed. All documents considered in
connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All
minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal,
subject to release only by a majority vote of the Commission or order of
a court of competent jurisdiction.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of
revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials,
and services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from
-17-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
each Participating State and impose fees on Licensees of Participating
States when a Compact Privilege is granted, to cover the cost of the
operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which must be
in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each
fiscal year for which sufficient revenue is not provided by other
sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Participating States
shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall
promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any Participating State, except by and with the
authority of the Participating State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established
under its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified
or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review
shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the
Commission.
F. The Executive Board
1. The Executive Board shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties,
and responsibilities of the Executive Board shall include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
Compact including compliance with the provisions of the Compact and the
Commission's Rules and bylaws;
b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws,
changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact
Participating States, fees charged to Licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately
-18-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
provided, including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Participating States and
providing compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during the
interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and
duties expressly reserved to the Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
2. The Executive Board shall be composed of up to seven members:
a. The Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and Treasurer of the Commission
and any other members of the Commission who serve on the Executive Board
shall be voting members of the Executive Board; and
b. Other than the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and Treasurer, the
Commission may elect up to three voting members from the current
membership of the Commission.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Board as
provided in the Commission's bylaws.
4. The Executive Board shall meet at least annually.
a. An Executive Board meeting at which it takes or intends to take
formal action on a matter shall be open to the public, except that the
Executive Board may meet in a closed, nonpublic session of a public
meeting when dealing with any of the matters covered under subsection D.4
of this section.
b. The Executive Board shall give five business days' notice of its
public meetings, posted on its website and as it may otherwise determine
to provide notice to persons with an interest in the public matters the
Executive Board intends to address at those meetings.
-19-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
5. The Executive Board may hold an emergency meeting when acting for
the Commission to:
a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
b. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds; or
c. Protect public health and safety.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the Commission shall have no greater liability than a
state employee would have under the same or similar circumstances, either
personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or
loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or
liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any
way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, or representative of the Commission in any civil
action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within
the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided
that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further,
that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from
that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
-20-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the
Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against
that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities; provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or
omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct,
which shall be governed solely by any other applicable State laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Participating State's state action immunity or state
action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the
Sherman Act, the Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or
anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the Participating States or by the Commission.
SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system
containing licensure, Adverse Action, and the presence of Significant
Investigative Information on all Licensees and applicants for a License
in Participating States.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary,
a Participating State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System
on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the
Rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
-21-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a Licensee, License applicant, or Compact
Privilege and information related thereto;
4. Nonconfidential information related to Alternative Program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and
other information related to such participation;
5. Any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason(s) for
such denial, (excluding the reporting of any criminal history record
information where prohibited by law);
6. The presence of Significant Investigative Information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this
Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of
the Commission.
C. The records and information provided to a Participating State
pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by
the Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated
business records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any
associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or
administrative proceedings in a Participating State.
D. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in
any Participating State will only be available to other Participating
States.
E. It is the responsibility of the Participating States to monitor
the database to determine whether Adverse Action has been taken against a
Licensee or License applicant. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee or License applicant in any Participating State will be
available to any other Participating State.
F. Participating States contributing information to the Data System
may designate information that may not be shared with the public without
the express permission of the contributing State.
G. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently
-22-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Participating State
contributing the information shall be removed from the Data System.
SECTION 9. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Commission Rule shall be invalid and have no
force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the
Rule is invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority
in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the
powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of
review.
B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each
Participating State, provided however that where the Rules of the
Commission conflict with the laws of the Participating State that
establish the Participating State's Scope of Practice as held by a court
of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission shall be
ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to
the criteria set forth in this section and the Rules adopted thereunder.
Rules shall become binding as of the date specified by the Commission for
each Rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Participating States
reject a Commission Rule or portion of a Commission Rule, by enactment of
a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact,
within four years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule
shall have no further force and effect in any Participating State or to
any State applying to participate in the Compact.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments,
-23-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at
least thirty days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will
hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide
a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the Commission's notices
of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other ways as the Commission may by Rule specify.
H. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the
Commission will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, videoconference, or
other electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for
access to the hearing in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested
person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all
written comments and documents received by the Commission in response to
the proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Commission Rule. Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this section.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all Commissioners, take
final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record.
-24-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for
the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection L of this
section, the effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty
days after the Commission issuing the notice that it adopted or amended
the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency Rule with twenty-four hours' notice, with
opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures
provided in the Compact and in this section shall be retroactively
applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later
than ninety days after the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes
of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted
immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the
website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by
any person for a period of thirty days after posting. The revision may be
challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change
to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
-25-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
N. No Participating State's rulemaking requirements shall apply
under this Compact.
SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in each
Participating State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions
necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of
competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is
located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to
the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute
resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the
selection or propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for
professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact
or Commission Rule and shall have standing to intervene in such a
proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of
process shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this
Compact, or promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Participating State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under
this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide
written notice to the defaulting State. The notice of default shall
describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any
-26-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
other action that the Commission may take, and shall offer training and
specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to
the other Participating States.
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the Commissioners, and all rights, privileges, and benefits
conferred on that State by this Compact may be terminated on the
effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period
of default.
D. Termination of participation in the Compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice
of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting State's
legislature, the defaulting State's State Licensing Authority or
Authorities, as applicable, and each of the Participating States' State
Licensing Authority or Authorities, as applicable.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective
date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the
effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a State's participation in this Compact,
that State shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees of the
State, including Licensees of other Participating States issued a Compact
Privilege to practice within that State, of such termination. The
terminated State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges then
in effect in that State for a minimum of one hundred eighty days after
the date of the notice of termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that
is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact,
-27-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting
State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices.
The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney's fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Participating State, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among
Participating States and between Participating States and non-
Participating States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion,
shall enforce the provisions of this Compact and the Commission's Rules.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action
against a Participating State in default in the United States District
Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought
may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs
of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies
herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the
defaulting Participating State's law.
3. A Participating State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal
-28-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief
and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney's fees.
4. No individual or entity other than a Participating State may
enforce this Compact against the Commission.
SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Participating State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the States that enacted
the Compact prior to the Commission convening ("Charter Participating
States") to determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter
Participating State is materially different than the Model Compact.
a. A Charter Participating State whose enactment is found to be
materially different from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Section 10.
b. If any Participating State is later found to be in default, or is
terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in
existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
Participating States should be less than seven.
2. Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to the
Charter Participating States shall be subject to the process set forth in
Section 7.C.23 to determine if their enactments are materially different
from the Model Compact and whether they qualify for participation in the
Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to
the effective date of the Compact or the Commission coming into existence
shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless specifically
-29-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
repudiated by the Commission.
4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission's
initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the
Commission's Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the
Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been previously
adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on
the day the Compact becomes law in that State.
B. Any Participating State may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing that State's enactment of the Compact.
1. A Participating State's withdrawal shall not take effect until
one hundred eighty days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing State's Licensing Authority or Authorities to comply with the
investigative and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this Compact
prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact,
the State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to
recognize all Compact Privileges to practice within that State granted
pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty days after
the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a Participating State and a non-Participating State
that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Participating States. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any
Participating State until it is enacted into the laws of all
Participating States.
SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
-30-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
A. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the
Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules
shall not be construed to limit the Commission's rulemaking authority
solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any
phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a court
of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any
Participating State, of a State seeking participation in the Compact, or
of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government,
agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court
of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact
and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the Commission may
deny a State's participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of Section 10.B, terminate a Participating State's
participation in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional
requirement of a Participating State is a material departure from the
Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the
constitution of any Participating State, the Compact shall remain in full
force and effect as to the remaining Participating States and in full
force and effect as to the Participating State affected as to all
severable matters.
SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Participating State that is not inconsistent with the
Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
Participating State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the
-31-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the
Participating States are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. Section 38-131, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-131 (1) An applicant for an initial license to practice as a
registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a physical therapist, a
physical therapy assistant, a psychologist, an advanced emergency medical
technician, an emergency medical technician, an audiologist, a speech-
language pathologist, a licensed independent mental health practitioner,
an occupational therapist, an occupational therapy assistant, a
dietitian, a certified social worker, a certified master social worker, a
licensed clinical social worker, a paramedic, a physician, an osteopathic
physician, a physician or osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a
temporary educational permit, a physician or osteopathic physician who is
an applicant for a temporary visiting faculty permit, a physician
assistant, a dentist, a dental hygienist, an optometrist, a podiatrist, a
veterinarian, an advanced practice registered nurse-nurse practitioner,
an advanced practice registered nurse-certified nurse midwife, or an
advanced practice registered nurse-certified registered nurse anesthetist
shall be subject to a criminal background check. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, such an applicant for an initial license
shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the Nebraska State Patrol for
a criminal history record information check. The applicant shall
authorize release of the results of the national criminal history record
information check by the Federal Bureau of Investigation to the
department. The applicant shall pay the actual cost of the fingerprinting
and criminal background check.
(2) The Nebraska State Patrol is authorized to submit the
fingerprints of such applicants to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
and to issue a report to the department that includes the criminal
-32-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
history record information concerning the applicant. The Nebraska State
Patrol shall forward submitted fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history record information check.
The Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a report to the department that
includes the criminal history record information concerning the
applicant.
(3) This section shall not apply to a dentist who is an applicant
for a dental locum tenens under section 38-1122, to a physician or
osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a physician locum tenens
under section 38-2036, or to a veterinarian who is an applicant for a
veterinarian locum tenens under section 38-3335.
(4) A physician or osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a
temporary educational permit shall have ninety days from the issuance of
the permit to comply with subsection (1) of this section and shall have
such permit suspended after such ninety-day period if the criminal
background check is not complete or revoked if the criminal background
check reveals that the applicant was not qualified for the permit.
(5) The department and the Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations concerning costs associated with the
fingerprinting and the national criminal history record information
check.
(6) For purposes of interpretation by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, the term department in this section means the Division of
Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 3. Section 38-1101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1101 Sections 38-1101 to 38-1152 and section 4 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Dentistry Practice Act.
Sec. 4. A person holding a compact privilege to practice in
Nebraska under the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact may engage in the
practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as authorized pursuant to such
-33-

LB83 LB83
2025 2025
compact.
Sec. 5. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. Original sections 38-131 and 38-1101, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-34-